Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Chapter 9

Commission for Uniform Legislation

4-9-101. Creation — Composition.

There is created a board of commissioners for the promotion of uniformity of legislation in the United States, composed of three (3) lawyers appointed by the governor, one (1) lawyer appointed by the speaker of the senate, one (1) lawyer appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, and any former member of the board who has been elected as a life member of the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws. Any vacancy on the board by resignation, death, or otherwise arising shall be filled by the appointment of a lawyer by the governor, if the vacant position was initially filled by appointment by the governor, by the speaker of the senate if the vacant position was initially filled by appointment by the speaker of the senate, or by the speaker of the house of representatives, if the vacant position was initially filled by appointment by the speaker of the house of representatives. In making appointments to the board, the governor, the speaker of the senate, and the speaker of the house of representatives shall strive to ensure that the makeup of the board reflects and represents the diversity of persons in this state.

The director of the office of legal services, or the director's designee, shall serve as an associate member of the board and may assist the board in the timely and thorough performance of its duties.

Acts 1909, ch. 86, § 1; Shan., § 3608a117; mod. Code 1932, § 1013; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-901; Acts 1981, ch. 31, § 3; 1988, ch. 1013, § 2; 2017, ch. 395, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The commission for uniform legislation, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2024. See §§4-29-112,4-29-245.

Cross-References. Duties of director of office of legal services, §§3-12-101,3-12-102.

4-9-102. Duties.

It is the duty of the board of commissioners to:

Examine the subjects upon which uniformity of legislation in the various states and territories of the union is desirable, but which are outside the jurisdiction of the congress of the United States;

Confer upon these matters with the commissioners appointed by other states and territories for the same purpose;

Consider and draft uniform laws to be submitted for approval and adoption by the several states; and

Generally advise and recommend such other or further course of action as shall accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

Acts 1909, ch. 86, § 2; Shan., § 3608a118; mod. Code 1932, § 1014; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-902.

4-9-103. Record — Reports.

The board of commissioners shall keep a record of its transactions, and shall at the session of each general assembly make a report of its doings and of its recommendations to the general assembly.

Acts 1909, ch. 86, § 3; Shan., § 3608a119; mod. Code 1932, § 1015; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-903.

4-9-104. Compensation.

No member of the board shall receive any compensation for such member's services.

Members, life members, and the associate member of the board shall be entitled to reimbursement for travel expenses incurred in attending an annual conference of the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws, which shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1909, ch. 86, § 4; Shan., § 3608a120; Code 1932, § 1016; Acts 1976, ch. 806, § 1(43); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-904; Acts 2017, ch. 395, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.